apertium-cat.cat.dix
<pardef n="at/endre__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>endríem</l>   <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>endria</l>    <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>endríeu</l>   <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>endries</l>   <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>endrien</l>   <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>endria</l>    <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>endrem</l>    <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>endré</l>     <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>endreu</l>    <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>endràs</l>    <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>endran</l>    <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>endrà</l>     <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>enguéssim</l> <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>engués</l>    <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>enguéssiu</l> <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>enguessis</l> <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>enguessin</l> <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>engués</l>    <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enent</l>     <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enent</l>     <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>enguérem</l>  <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>enguí</l>     <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>enguéreu</l>  <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>engueres</l>  <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>engueren</l>  <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>engué</l>     <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enguem</l>    <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enguem</l>    <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eneu</l>      <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eneu</l>      <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>én</l>        <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>én</l>        <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aclareix"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>enguin</l>   <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>enguin</l>   <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>engui</l>    <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>engui</l>    <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>enguen</l>   <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>enguen</l>   <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>enga</l>     <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>enga</l>     <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>endre</l>     <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>endre</l>     <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eníem</l>     <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enia</l>      <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eníeu</l>     <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enies</l>     <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enien</l>     <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enia</l>      <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>enguéssim</l><r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>enguérem</l> <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>engués</l>   <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>enguera</l>  <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>enguéssiu</l><r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>enguéreu</l> <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>enguessis</l><r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>engueres</l> <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>enguessin</l><r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>engueren</l> <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>engués</l>   <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>enguera</l>  <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eses</l>      <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>esa</l>       <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>esos</l>      <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ès</l>        <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>és</l>        <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enem</l>      <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enc</l>       <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eneu</l>      <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enen</l>      <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>én</l>        <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enguem</l>    <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>engui</l>    <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>enga</l>     <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>engueu</l>    <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>enguis</l>   <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>engues</l>   <r>endre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="atendre">         <i>at</i><par n="at/endre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="contendre">       <i>cont</i><par n="at/endre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desatendre">      <i>desat</i><par n="at/endre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="encendre">        <i>enc</i><par n="at/endre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="entendre">        <i>ent</i><par n="at/endre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="estendre">        <i>est</i><par n="at/endre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="malentendre">     <i>malent</i><par n="at/endre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pretendre">       <i>pret</i><par n="at/endre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desentendre" a="prompsit"><i>desent</i><par n="at/endre__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="despendre" a="prompsit"><i>desp</i><par n="at/endre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="estendre acta" a="prompsit"><i>est</i><par n="at/endre__vblex"/><p><l><b/>acta</l><r><g><b/>acta</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="coestendre">      <i>coest</i><par n="at/endre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="distendre">       <i>dist</i><par n="at/endre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sobreentendre">   <i>sobreent</i><par n="at/endre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="suspendre de sou i de feina"><i>susp</i><par n="at/endre__vblex"/><p><l><b/>de<b/>sou<b/>i<b/>de<b/>feina</l><r><g><b/>de<b/>sou<b/>i<b/>de<b/>feina</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="entendre ni pruna"><i>ent</i><par n="at/endre__vblex"/><p><l><b/>ni<b/>pruna</l><r><g><b/>ni<b/>pruna</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="entendre ni un borrall"><i>ent</i><par n="at/endre__vblex"/><p><l><b/>ni<b/>un<b/>borrall</l><r><g><b/>ni<b/>un<b/>borrall</g></r></p></e>
